District of Columbia statutes.
7-1103

Supplementary agreements.

The Compact Administrator is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into supplementary agreements with appropriate officials of party states pursuant to Articles VII and XI of the Compact. In the event that such supplementary agreements shall require or contemplate the use of any institution or facility of the District of Columbia or require or contemplate the provision of any service by the District of Columbia, no such agreement shall have force or effect until approved by the head of the department or agency under whose jurisdiction said institution or facility is operated or whose department or agency will be charged with the rendering of such service.

Apr. 26, 1972, 86 Stat. 130, Pub. L. 92-280, § 4
1981 Ed., § 6-1803.
1973 Ed., § 6-1603.
The “Compact,” referred to at the end of the first sentence, is set forth in § 7-1101.